Rhode Island, session 2025, SB290.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Limitations on actions based on defamation relating to sexual assault,
harassment or discrimination.
(a) An individual making a communication regarding an incident of sexual assault,
harassment, or discrimination, upon proof the communication was made without malice or gross
negligence, shall have an affirmative defense to civil liability in any action for defamation.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "communication" means factual information related to
an incident of sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination experienced by the individual making
the communication, including, but not limited to, any of the following:
(1) An act of sexual assault;
(2) An act of sexual harassment;
(3) An act of workplace harassment or discrimination, failure to prevent an act of
workplace harassment or discrimination, aiding, abetting, inciting, compelling, or coercing an act
of workplace harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for reporting or
opposing workplace harassment or discrimination as defined in § 28-51-1;
(4) An act of harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for
reporting harassment or discrimination, by the owner of a housing accommodation, as described in

chapter 37 of title 34;
(5) An act of harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for
reporting harassment or discrimination, based on employment or housing or racial discrimination;
(6) An act of cyber sexual bullying, as defined in § 16-21-34; or
(7) An act of sexual harassment in an institution of higher education described in chapters
76 and 76.1 of title 16.
(c) A prevailing defendant in any defamation action brought against that defendant for
making a communication in which the defendant prevails upon the affirmative defense provided
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be entitled to their reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs for successfully defending the litigation, plus treble damages for any harm caused to the
defendant by the defamation action in addition to any other relief otherwise permitted by law.
(d) This section shall only apply to an individual that has, or at any time had, a reasonable
basis to file a complaint of sexual assault, harassment, or discrimination, whether the complaint is,
or was, filed or not.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000595
========
LC000595 - Page 2 of 3